New York, session 2025-2026, S4766.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (c) of section 612 of the tax law is amended by 2 adding a new paragraph 48 to read as follows: 3 (48) One hundred percent of the capital gains from the sale of stock 4 or member interest from a New York corporation or limited liability 5 company to an employee-owned enterprise, as defined in subdivision five 6 of section eighteen hundred thirty-six-b of the public authorities law. 7 In order to qualify for such modification as described in this para- 8 graph, such employee-owned enterprise must have its commercial domicile 9 in New York. If the employee-owned enterprise is an "employee stock 10 ownership plan," it must comply with federal requirements as such plan 11 is defined in 26 U.S.C. § 4975(e)(7). 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08883-01-5